Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4604
Common law and principles of equity.

The common law and principles of equity supplement the Uniform Powers of Appointment Act except to the extent modified by the Uniform Powers of Appointment Act or law of this state other than the Uniform Powers of Appointment Act.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 27.